cs: Fotografická chemická forma: Krystaly; Kapalina; Prášek; Tablety; Jiné
da: Fotografisk kemisk form: Krystaller; Væske; Pulver; Tabletter; Andet
nb: Fotografisk kjemisk form: Krystaller; Væske; Pulver; Tabletter; Annet
sl-SI: Fotografska kemična oblika: Kristali; Tekočina; Prašek; Tablete; Drugo
zh-TW: 相片顯影劑形式: 水晶; 液態; 粉末; 片劑; 其他
tr: Fotografik kimyasal form: Kristaller; Sıvı; Pudra; Tabletler; Diğer
ro-RO: Formă substanțe chimice fotografice: Cristale; Lichid; Pudră; Tablete; Altele
zh-CN: 摄影用化学品形态: 水晶; 液体; 粉末; 片剂; 其他
de: Form der Fotochemikalie: Kristalle; Flüssig; Puder; Tabletten; Sonstiges
fi: Valokuvauskemiallinen muoto: Kristallit; Nestemäinen; Jauhe; Tabletit; Muu
pl: Forma chemikaliów fotograficznych: Kryształy; Płyn; Proszek; Tabletki; Inne
ru: Форма фотохимикатов: Кристаллы; Жидкость; Порошок; Таблетки; Другое
sv: Fotografisk kemisk form: Kristaller; Vätska; Pulver; Tabletter; Övrigt
sk-SK: Forma fotografickej chemikálie: Kryštály; Kvapalina; Prášok; Tablety; Iné
en: Photographic chemical form: Crystals; Liquid; Powder; Tablets; Other
hu: Fényképészeti vegyszer formája: Kristályok; Folyadék; Por; Tabletták; Egyéb
ja: 写真現像薬剤の形態: クリスタル; リキッド; パウダー; 錠剤; その他
es: Forma química fotográfica: Cristales; Líquido; Polvo; Tabletas; Otros
th: รูปแบบสารเคมีด้านการถ่ายภาพ: คริสตัล; แบบเหลว; แบบผง; แท็บเล็ต; อื่นๆ
el: Μορφή φωτογραφικών χημικών ουσιών: Κρύσταλλοι; Υγρό; Σκόνη; Ταμπλέτες; Άλλο
vi: Hóa chất rửa ảnh: Pha lê; Liquid; Bột; Viên nén; Khác
pt-BR: Formulação do químico fotográfico: Cristais; Líquido; Pó; Comprimidos; Outro
nl: Vorm fotochemicaliën: Kristallen; Vloeistof; Poeder; Tabletten; Andere
ko: 사진용 화학용품 형태: 수정; 액상; 가루; 정제; 기타
fr: Forme chimique photographique: Cristaux; Liquide; Poudré; Comprimés; Autre
it: Composizione dei prodotti chimici per foto: Cristalli; Liquido; Polvere; Pastiglie; Altro
hr-HR: Oblik fotografskih kemikalija: Kristali; Tekućina; Prah; Tablete; Ostalo
pt-PT: Forma de químico fotográfico: Cristais; Líquido; Pó; Tablets; Outro
bg-BG: Форма на фотографски химикали: Кристали; Течност; Пудра; Таблетки; Други
lt-LT: Cheminė medžiaga juostelės ryškinimui: Kristalai; Skystis; Milteliai; Tabletės; Kita